zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 厨房电器 > 咖啡机/浓缩咖啡机: 冷萃咖啡机; 滴滤式咖啡机; 意大利浓缩咖啡壶; 意式浓缩咖啡机; 法式滤压壶; 渗滤式咖啡壶; 手冲咖啡机; 单杯咖啡机; 虹吸式咖啡壶
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Utensílios para cozinha > Cafeteiras e máquinas de café expresso: Cafeteiras cold brew; Cafeteiras; Cafeteiras italianas; Máquinas de café expresso; Prensas francesas de café; Cafeteiras por percolação; Cafeteiras pour over; Cafeteiras de dose única; Cafeteiras a vácuo
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Keittiölaitteet > Kahvinkeittimet ja espressokoneet: Cold Brew -kahvinvalmistuslaitteet; Suodatinkahvinkeittimet; Sähkö- ja liesikäyttöiset espressopannut; Espressokoneet; Pressopannut; Perkolaattorit; Pour Over -kahvinvalmistuslaitteet; Yhden annoksen kahvinvalmistuslaitteet; Vakuumikahvinkeittimet
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Кухонная техника > Кофеварки и кофемашины: Кофеварки холодного заваривания; Капельные кофеварки; Электрические и классические гейзерные кофеварки; Эспрессо-машины; Френч-прессы; Кофейники с ситечком; Кофеварки для заваривания кофе методом пролива; Кофеварки для приготовления одной порции кофе; Вакуумные кофеварки
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Кухненски уреди > Кафемашини и машини за еспресо: Кафемашини за студено пресоване; Капкови кафемашини; Електрически и кафеварки за котлон; Машини за еспресо; Френски преси; Перколатори; Кафемашини за ръчно преливане; Кафемашини за една доза; Сифони за приготвяне на кафе
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Akcesoria kuchenne > Ekspresy do kawy i espresso: Zaparzacze do cold brew; Przelewowe ekspresy do kawy; Kawiarki; Ekspresy do espresso; Zaparzacze do kawy; Perkolatory; Przelewowe zaparzacze do kawy; Jednofiliżankowe ekspresy do kawy; Próżniowe ekspresy do kawy
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Kjøkkenapparater > Kaffe- og espressomaskiner: Maskiner til kaldbrygging av kaffe; Dryppkaffemaskiner; Elektriske og ovnsbaserte espressokanner; Espressomaskiner; Presskanner; Perkolatorer; Kaffemaskiner, helle over; Enkeltkopp-kaffemaskiner; Vakuumkaffetraktere
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Kuhinjski aparati > Aparati za kavo in aparati za espresso: Kavni aparati za hladno pripravljeno kavo; Kavni aparati s filtri; Električni in kuhalni lonci za espresso; Aparati za espresso; Preša za kavo; Perkolatorji; Kavni aparati za kavo s prelivanjem; Kavni aparati za pripravo ene skodelice kave; Vakuumski aparati za kavo
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Electrodomésticos de cocina > Cafeteras: Cafeteras de café en frío; Cafeteras de filtro; Cafeteras italianas tradicionales y eléctricas; Máquinas de expreso; Cafeteras de émbolo; Cafeteras con filtro; Cafeteras de goteo manual; Cafeteras monodosis; Cafetera cona (por vacío)
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Kuchyňské spotřebiče > Kávovary a automaty na espreso: Přístroje na přípravu studené kávy; Překapávací kávovary; Moka konvice; Automaty na espreso; Francouzské kávovary; Kávovary; Kávovary na překapávanou kávu; Jednoporcové kávovary; Vakuové kávovary
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Konyhai gépek > Kávéfőzők és eszpresszógépek: Hidegáztatásos kávéfőzők; Csepegtető kávéfőzők; Elektromos és tűzhelyes eszpresszóedények; Eszpresszógépek; Franciaprések; Perkolátorok; Filteres kávéfőzők; Egyszemélyes kávéfőzők; Vákuumos kávéfőzők
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Köksutrustning > Kaffebryggare och espressomaskiner: Kaffebryggare för kallbryggning; Kaffebryggare; Elektriska espressobryggare och espressobryggare för spisen; Espressomaskiner; Pressobryggare; Perkulatorer; Kaffebryggare för filterbryggning; Kapselmaskiner; Kaffepumpor
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Kitchen Appliances > Coffee Makers & Espresso Machines: Cold Brew Coffee Makers; Drip Coffee Makers; Electric & Stovetop Espresso Pots; Espresso Machines; French Presses; Percolators; Pour Over Coffee Makers; Single-Serve Coffee Makers; Vacuum Coffee Makers
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Virtuvės prietaisai > Kavos ir espreso aparatai: Šaltos kavos virimo aparatai; Filtriniai kavos aparatai; Elektriniai ir ant viryklės kaitinami espreso puodeliai; Espreso aparatai; Prancūziški kavos presai; Perkoliatoriai; Kavos filtravimo aparatai; Vienkartinio naudojimo kavos virimo aparatai; Vakuuminiai kavos aparatai
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Eletrodomésticos de cozinha > Máquinas de café e expresso: Máquinas de café a frio; Máquinas de café com filtro; Cafeteiras elétricas e italianas; Máquinas expresso; Cafeteiras de prensa francesa; Cafeteiras; Máquinas de café de filtro; Máquinas de café de dose única; Máquinas de café a vácuo
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Keukenapparatuur > Koffiezetapparaten en espressomachines: Cold brew koffiezetapparaten; Koffiezetapparaten; Espressomachines en -potjes; Espressoapparaten; Cafetière; Percolators; Handfilter koffiezetapparaten; Koffiezetapparaten voor één kopje; Vacuümkoffiezetapparaten
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Thiết bị nhà bếp > Máy pha cà phê và máy Espresso: Máy pha cà phê ủ lạnh; Máy pha cà phê phin; Ấm điện & Ấm đun pha cà phê Espresso; Máy pha cà phê espresso; Bình pha cà phê; Bình lọc pha cà phê bằng áp suất hơi nước; Máy pha cà phê nhỏ giọt; Máy cà phê một tách; Máy pha cà phê chân không
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 주방가전 > 커피 메이커/에스프레소 머신: 콜드브루 커피 메이커; 드립 커피 메이커; 전기/스토브 에스프레소 주전자; 에스프레소 머신; 프렌치 포트; 퍼컬레이터; 푸어오버 커피 메이커; 1인용 커피 메이커; 진공 커피 메이커
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 廚房電器 > 咖啡機/義式咖啡機: 冷萃咖啡壺; 滴漏式咖啡機; 電子/爐式摩卡壺; 義式濃縮咖啡機; 法式濾壓壺; 過濾式咖啡壺; 手沖咖啡壺; 單杯式咖啡機; 虹吸式咖啡壺
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > キッチン家電 > コーヒーメーカー・エスプレッソマシン: コールドブリュー式コーヒーメーカー; コーヒーメーカー; 電気式・直火式マキネッタ; エスプレッソマシン; フレンチプレス; パーコレーター; ドリップ式コーヒーメーカー; シングルサーブ式コーヒーメーカー; サイフォン式コーヒーメーカー
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Køkkenudstyr > Kaffemaskiner og espressomaskiner: Maskiner til koldbrygget kaffe; Kaffemaskiner; Espressokander – elektriske og til komfur; Espressomaskiner; Filterkaffekander; Perkolatorer; Pour over-kaffemaskiner; Kaffemaskiner til én kop; Vakuumkaffemaskiner
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Συσκευές κουζίνας > Καφετιέρες & μηχανές εσπρέσο: Καφετιέρες cold brew; Καφετιέρες φίλτρου; Ηλεκτρικές και εστίες εσπρέσο; Μηχανές εσπρέσο; Χειροκίνητες πρέσες για γαλλικό καφέ; Καφετιέρες φίλτρου; Καφετιέρες Pour Over; Καφετιέρες μονής δόσης; Καφετιέρες κενού αέρος
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Électroménager de cuisine > Machines à café et machines à expresso: Cafetières à infusion à froid; Cafetières filtres; Cafetières italiennes; Machines à expresso; Cafetières à piston; Percolateurs; Cafetières à filtre; Cafetières à portion individuelle; Cafetières à dépression
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Elettrodomestici > Macchine caffè ed espresso: Makerper caffè freddo; Macchine per caffè americano; Caffettiera elettriche e da fornello; Macchine per espresso; Caffettiere francesi; Caffettiere a filtro; Makerper il caffè filtrato; Makerper caffè monodose; Macchine da caffè a vuoto
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Kuhinjski aparati > Aparati za kavu i espresso aparati: Aparati za hladno kuhanu kavu; Aparati za filter kavu; Lončići i električna kuhala za espresso; Espresso aparati; Francuske preše; Perkolatori; Aparat za filtar kavu; Jednostruki aparat za kavu; Vakuumski aparati za kavu
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Mutfak Aletleri > Kahve Makineleri ve Espresso Makineleri: Soğuk Demleme Kahve Makineleri; Filtre Kahve Makineleri; Elektrikli ve Ocak Üstü Espresso Cezveleri; Espresso Makineleri; Kahve Demleme Aparatları; Süzgeçli Kahve İbrikleri; Pour Over Kahve Demleyiciler; Tek Kişilik Kahve Makineleri; Vakumlu Kahve Makineleri
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Küchengeräte > Kaffee- & Espressomaschinen: Cold-Brew-Kaffeemaschine; Filterkaffeemaschinen; Espressokannen; Espressomaschinen; Pressstempelkannen; Perkolatoren & Kaffeebrüher; Pour-Over-Kaffeebereiter; Single-Serve-Kaffeemaschinen; Vakuumbereiter
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > เครื่องใช้ในครัว > เครื่องทำกาแฟและเครื่องชงเอสเปรสโซ่: เครื่องชงกาแฟสกัดเย็น; เครื่องชงกาแฟแบบหยด; เครื่องชงเอสเปรสโซ่แบบไฟฟ้าและแบบ Stovetop; เครื่องชงเอสเพรสโซ่; เครื่องชงกาแฟแบบเฟรนช์เพรส; เครื่องต้มกรอง; เครื่องชงกาแฟแบบดริป; เครื่องชงกาแฟแบบเสิร์ฟเดี่ยว; เครื่องทำกาแฟสุญญากาศ
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Kuchynské spotrebiče > Kávovary a espresso kávovary: Kávovary na studenú kávu; Prekvapkávacie kávovary; Elektrické a moka kávovary; Espresso kávovary; French Press kávovar; Perkolátory; Kávovary na prekvapkávanú kávu; Kávovary na jednu kávu; Vákuové kávovary
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Electrocasnice de bucătărie > Cafetiere și espressoare: Cafetiere pentru infuzie rece; Cafetiere; Espressoare electrice și espressoare pentru aragaz; Espressoare; Prese franceze; Percolatoare; Cafetiere pour-over; Cafetiere pentru o porție; Oale cu vid